Utah statutes.
17-27a-602.   Planning commission preparation and recommendation of
subdivision ordinance -- Adoption or rejection by legislative body.
(1)  The planning commission shall:
(a)  prepare and recommend a proposed ordinance to the legislative body that
regulates the subdivision of land;
(b)  prepare and recommend or consider and recommend a proposed ordinance that
amends the regulation of the subdivision of the unincorporated land in the
county;
(c)  provide notice consistent with Section 17-27a-205; and
(d)  hold a public hearing on the proposed ordinance before making its final
recommendation to the legislative body.
(2)  The county legislative body may adopt or reject the ordinance either as
proposed by the planning commission or after making any revision the county
legislative body considers appropriate.
